Utah statutes.
58-28-303.   License -- Display -- Revocation for nondisplay or nonrenewal.
A licensed veterinarian shall display the veterinarian's license in a
conspicuous place in the veterinarian's principal place of business.  The
division may revoke any license which is not displayed in accordance with this
section.
